src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
akoin+A:akoin A_IS-N-PL-GEN  "akkamainen" ;
alembi+A:alemb A_PAREMBI  "alempi" ;
ažbo+A:ažbo A_UNDECL  "mokoma" ;
fiolietovoi+A:fiolietovoi A_RAHMANNOI  "violetti" ;
harmuapiä+A:harmua#piä A_PIÄ  "harmaapää" ;
hebožien+A:hebožien A_IS-N-PL-GEN  "hevos-" ;
hengensalbai+A:hengensalba A_  "hengeäsalpaava" ;
herran+A:herran A_IS-N-SG-GEN  "herran" ;
hondo+A:hondo A_RUADO  "heikko" ;
hurai+A:hura A_PIIRAI  "vasen" ;
hyvä+A:hyvä A_HYVÄ  "hyvä" ;
hämär+A:hämärä A_KALA  "hämärä" ;
jiännös+A:jiännökse A_ALUS  "loppu-" ;
kaiken% muailman+A:kaiken% muailman A_EX  "maailmanlaajuinen" ;
kalie+A:kalie A_HARDIE  "kolea" ;
kauniš+A:kaune A_RAIŠ  "kaunis" ;
keksevä+A:keksevä A_OZA  "kekseliäs" ;
kelduruspakko+A:keldu#ruspakko A_RUADO  "kellanpunainen" ;
kiduiččii+A:kiduičči A_PEZII  "kivulloinen" ;
kirakko+A:kirakko A_RUNO  "hauras" ;
kirjavu+A:kirjava A_KOIRU  "kirjava" ;
kirjuttamatoi+A:kirjuttamat A_HUOLETOI  "kirjoittamaton" ;
koiran-+A:koiran- A_IS-N-SG-GEN  "koiran" ;
konkriettine+A:konkrietti A_NAINE  "konkreettinen" ;
kuivannuh+A:kuivannu A_TULLUH  "kuivunut" ;
kuurnis+A:kuurne A_KUURNIS  "kuuro" ;
kučuttu+A:kučuttu A_KOIVU  "kutsuttu" ;
kylmännyh+A:kylmänny A_PESSYH  "kohmeinen" ;
kypsy+A:kypsä A_PÄIVY  "kypsä" ;
käbäine+A:käbä A_LIYGILÄINE  "kätönen" ;
kävelii+A:käveli A_PEZII  "kävelevä" ;
leppei+A:leppe A_VALGEI  "leppoisa" ;
leveihardie+A:levei#hardie A_HARDIE  "leveäharteinen" ;
leveišokku+A:levei#šokku A_AKKU  "leveäposkinen, paksuposkinen" ;
liikkui+A:liikku A_OSTAI  "liikkuva" ;
maksankarvaine+A:maksankarva A_KARJALAINE  "ruskea" ;
meččähine+A:meččähi A_KIELINE  "metsäinen" ;
monenmoizet+A:monen#mo A_TOINE-PL  "monenmoiset" ;
muadunnun+A:muadunnun A_UNDECL  "kurja (itseni, itkuvirsissä)" ;
muamon+A:muamon A_IS-N-SG-GEN  "äidin" ;
murenii+A:mureni A_PAGIZII  "murea" ;
mustu+A:musta A_KOIRU  "musta" ;
muu+A:muu A_KUU  "muu" ;
muureh+A:muureh A_PEREH  "kuivettunut" ;
mygyri+A:mygyri A_ARTELI  "kupera" ;
nimetöi+A:nimet A_JIÄTÖI  "nimetön" ;
nuorembi+A:nuoremb A_PAREMBI  "nuorempi" ;
näiviš+A:näive A_RAIŠ  "näivettynyt" ;
nämä+A:nämä A-DEM_NÄMÄ  "nämä" ;
nämä+A:nämmä A-DEM_NÄMÄ  "nämä" ;
ohottu+A:ohotta A_AKKU  "innokas" ;
oma+A:oma A_OZA  "oma" ;
paha+A:paha A_KALA  "paha" ;
paharaiska+A:paharaiska A_MUARJU  "kelvoton" ;
paljaspiä+A:paljaspiä A_BAHUV  "kalju" ;
paranematoi+A:paranemat A_HUOLETOI  "paranematon" ;
peitošnoi+A:peitošnoi A_RAHMANNOI  "salainen" ;
pienehkö+A:pienehkö A_RUNO  "pienehkö" ;
poltettu+A:poltettu A_  "poltettu" ;
puaksu+A:puaksu A_KOIVU  "tiheä" ;
pädöy+A:pädö A_KESTÄY  "tarpeellinen" ;
pörhöpiä+A:pörhöpiä A_BAHUV  "pörröpää" ;
ravižii+A:raviži A_PAGIZII  "huutava" ;
revinnyh+A:revinny A_PESSYH  "revennyt" ;
ruadai+A:ruada A_OSTAI  "työtätekevä" ;
ruostunuh+A:ruostunu A_TULLUH  "ruostunut" ;
räkki+A:räkki A_HÄKKI  "helteinen" ;
seže+A:seže A_  "sama" ;
siästöžy+A:siästöžä A_PÄIVY  "säästäväinen" ;
sundo+A:sundo A_RUADO  "haalea" ;
synnynnäine+A:synnynnä A_LIYGILÄINE  "synnynnäinen" ;
syvys-+A:syvys- A_  "syys-" ;
syömäri+A:syömäri A_ARTELI  "ahne" ;
talvine+A:talvi A_NAINE  "talvinen" ;
tiettäy+A:tiettä A_KESTÄY  "tunnettu" ;
toine+A:to A_TOINE  "toinen" ;
toižen% suurut+A:toižen% suuru A_OLUT  "erisuuruinen" ;
tuagei+A:tuage A_VALGEI  "taaja" ;
tulii+A:tuli A_KONDII  "tuleva" ;
tullut+A:tullu A_TULLUT  "(yougi:) tulokas" ;
umbimärgä+A:umbi#märgä A_SÄYNÄ  "(yougi:) läpimärkä" ;
urai+A:ura A_PIIRAI  "järjetön" ;
vaikkanaine+A:vaikkana A_KARJALAINE  "vaitonainen" ;
vajočču+A:vajočču A_KOIVU  "vajottava" ;
vakki+A:vakki A_UNDECL  "outo" ;
valmis+A:valme A_KUURNIS  "valmis" ;
vara+A:vara A_KALA  "vara-" ;
vastumieline+A:vastumieli A_KIELINE  "vastenmielinen" ;
vedreh+A:vedre A_PEREH  "puhdas" ;
verikynzi+A:verikynzi A_BAHUV  "saita" ;
vikkelä+A:vikkelä A_OZA  "(yougi:) vilkas" ;
viluhko+A:viluhko A_RUNO  "kylmähkö" ;
viäryniekku+A:viäryniekka A_MUARJU  "syyllinen" ;
viärätöi+A:viärät A_JIÄTÖI  "syytön" ;
yhtenjytyt+A:yhtenjytty A_OLUT  "(yougi:) yhtäpitävä" ;
yhtenkallehus+A:yhtenkallehu A_PUHTAHUS  "samanarvoinen" ;
yhtenmoine+A:yhten#mo A_TOINE  "samanlainen" ;
äimel+A:äimel A_MADAL  "äitelä" ;
šärgietty+A:šärgietty A_HERY  "särkynyt" ;
